Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.400

General license administration.

(1) Unless otherwise provided, the provisions in this section apply to a license or certificate issued under this chapter.

(2) Applicants for a new or renewal license issued by the department must submit applications on forms prescribed by the department.

(3) The license fee must accompany any application submittal.

(4) The department must adopt rules for an annual license and renewal fee to defray the costs of administering a licensing program, including inspections.

(5) The department must issue a license to the applicant if the application is complete and the applicant's food facility complies with this chapter, including the rules adopted under it.

[ 2018 c 236 s 401.]